Utah statutes.
26-28-106.   Amending or revoking anatomical gift before donor's death.
(1)  Subject to Section 26-28-108, a donor or other person authorized to make
an anatomical gift under Section 26-28-104 may amend or revoke an anatomical
gift by:
(a)  a record signed by:
(i)  the donor;
(ii)  the other person; or
(iii)  subject to Subsection (2), another individual acting at the direction
of the donor or the other person if the donor or other person is physically
unable to sign; or
(b)  a later-executed document of gift that amends or revokes a previous
anatomical gift or portion of an anatomical gift, either expressly or by
inconsistency.
(2)  A record signed pursuant to Subsection (1)(a)(iii) must:
(a)  be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a
disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the donor or the
other person; and
(b)  state that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in Subsection
(1)(a).
(3)  Subject to Section 26-28-108, a donor or other person authorized to make
an anatomical gift under Section 26-28-104 may revoke an anatomical gift by
the destruction or cancellation of the document of gift, or the portion of the
document of gift used to make the gift, with the intent to revoke the gift.
(4)  A donor may amend or revoke an anatomical gift that was not made in a
will by any form of communication during a terminal illness or injury
addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested
witness.
(5)  A donor who makes an anatomical gift in a will may amend or revoke the
gift in the manner provided for amendment or revocation of wills or as
provided in Subsection (1).
